Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 7

Community Mental Health Center Cooperation Act

33-2-701. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Community Mental Health Center Cooperation Act of 1998.”

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-2-901; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-2-702. Statement of policy.

It is the policy of this state to displace competition among community mental health centers with regulation to the extent set forth in this part and to actively supervise the regulation to the fullest extent required by law, in order to promote cooperation and coordination among community mental health centers in the provision of mental health services to citizens receiving the services under programs funded or administered by departments or agencies of state government, including, but not limited to, the TennCare program.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-2-902; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 349, § 2.

33-2-703. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Community mental health center” includes any parent or corporate affiliate of a community mental health center as defined in § 33-1-101;

“Cooperative agreement” means an agreement among two (2) or more community mental health centers for the offering, provision, operation, coordination, planning, funding, pricing, contracting, utilization review, or management of mental health and related services under programs funded or administered by departments or agencies of state government, including, but not limited to, the TennCare program, or the sharing, allocation, or referral of service recipients, personnel, instructional programs, support services, ancillary services, and facilities, or other services traditionally offered by community mental health centers for the programs; and

“Intervenor” means any hospital, physician, allied health professional, health care provider or other person furnishing goods or services to, or in competition with, community mental health center, insurer, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, hospital and medical services corporation, preferred provider organization, health maintenance organization, behavioral health organization, or any employer or association that directly or indirectly provides health care benefits to its employees or members.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-2-903; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-2-704. Cooperative agreements among community mental health centers — Review by department — Certificate of public advantage.

A community mental health center may negotiate and enter into cooperative agreements with other community mental health centers in the state if the likely benefits resulting from the agreements outweigh any disadvantages attributable to a reduction in competition that may result from the agreements.

Parties to a cooperative agreement may apply to the department for a certificate of public advantage governing that cooperative agreement. The application shall include an executed written copy of the cooperative agreement and describe the nature and scope of the cooperation in the agreement and any consideration passing to any party under the agreement. A copy of the application and copies of all additional related materials shall be submitted to the attorney general and reporter and to the department at the same time.

The department shall review the application in accordance with the standards set forth in subsection (e) and may hold a public hearing in accordance with the rules adopted by the department. The department shall give notice of the application to interested parties by publishing a notice in the state administrative register in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Any intervenor may intervene in the proceeding and shall have standing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. The department shall grant or deny the application within sixty (60) days of the date of filing of the application, and that decision shall be in writing and set forth the basis for the decision. The department shall furnish a copy of the decision to the applicants, the attorney general and reporter, and any intervenor. Should the department determine that additional time is needed to review the application, the department, upon written notice to the applicants, the attorney general and reporter and any intervenor, may extend the time for review for a period of thirty (30) days except that, in the discretion of the commissioner, the period may be extended for an additional thirty (30) days.

If the cooperative agreement primarily relates to a program funded or administered by another department or agency of state government, the department may refer the application to that other department or agency to conduct the review and render the decision required by this part.

The department shall issue a certificate of public advantage for a cooperative agreement if it, or the other department or agency to which the department has referred the application pursuant to subsection (d), determines that the likely benefits resulting from the agreement outweigh any disadvantages attributable to a reduction in competition that may result from the agreement.

In evaluating the potential benefits of a cooperative agreement, the department may consider whether one (1) or more of the following benefits may result from the cooperative agreement:

Enhanced quality of mental health and mental health-related care provided to state citizens, especially those receiving the services under programs funded or administered by departments or agencies of state government;

Preservation of community mental health facilities in geographical proximity to the communities traditionally served by those facilities;

Gains in the cost-efficiency of services provided by the community mental health centers involved;

Improvements in the utilization of mental health resources and equipment;

Avoidance of duplication of mental health resources; and

Enhanced efficiency of the administration of programs of state government to provide mental health services to citizens of this state.

The department's evaluation of any disadvantages attributable to any reduction in competition likely to result from the agreement may include, but need not be limited to, the following factors:

The extent of any likely adverse impact on the ability of health maintenance organizations, preferred provider organizations, managed health care organizations or other health care payers to negotiate optimal payment and service arrangements with community mental health centers, or other health care providers;

The extent of any reduction in competition among physicians, allied health professionals, other health care providers, or other persons furnishing goods or services to, or in competition with, community mental health centers that is likely to result directly or indirectly from the cooperative agreement;

The extent of any likely adverse impact on persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance in the quality, availability and price of health care services; and

The availability of arrangements that are less restrictive to competition and achieve the same benefits or a more favorable balance of benefits over disadvantages attributable to any reduction in competition likely to result from the agreement.

The department, or other department or agency to which the department has referred the application under subsection (d), shall consult with the attorney general and reporter regarding its evaluation of any potential reduction in competition resulting from a cooperative agreement. The attorney general and reporter may consult with the United States department of justice or the federal trade commission regarding its evaluation of any potential reduction in competition resulting from a cooperative agreement. Should the attorney general and reporter, after consultation with the department, determine that it is necessary to consult with the United States department of justice or the federal trade commission, or determines that further information is needed to review the application, the department, upon written notice to the applicant, attorney general and reporter, and any intervenor, may extend the time for approval or disapproval of an application an additional forty-five (45) days.

If the department, or the other department or agency to which the department has referred the application under subsection (d), determines that the likely benefits resulting from a certified agreement no longer outweigh any disadvantages attributable to any potential reduction in competition resulting from the agreement, the department, or the other department or agency to which the department has referred the application under subsection (d), may initiate contested case proceedings to terminate the certificate of public advantage in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The department shall maintain on file all cooperative agreements for which certificates of public advantage remain in effect. Any party to a cooperative agreement who terminates the agreement shall file a notice of termination.

The department, or the other department or agency to which the department has referred the application under subsection (d), shall review, on at least an annual basis, each certificate of public advantage it has granted under this part. The certificate shall be renewed if it is determined that the certificate continues to comply with the standards of subsection (e).

Prior to making an application for a certificate of public advantage, the parties may submit an initial filing at least forty-five (45) days prior to filing the application. The initial filing shall summarize the proposed cooperative agreement, describe the affected geographic market areas and those matters described in subsections (f) and (g). The department shall review the initial filing within thirty (30) days of receipt of the filing, informing the parties of any deficiencies along with a statement of specific remedial measures as to how the deficiencies could be corrected. A review of the initial filing by the department does not constitute approval of the final application.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 4; T.C.A., § 33-2-904; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 349, §§ 3-8.

33-2-705. Judicial review of department decision.

Any applicant or intervenor aggrieved by a decision of the department, or the other department or agency of state government to which the department has referred the application under § 33-2-704(d), in granting or denying an application, refusing to act on an application, or terminating a certificate, is entitled to judicial review of the decision in accordance with Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-2-905; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-706. Effect of grant or denial of certificate of public advantage.

Notwithstanding title 47, chapter 25, or any other law to the contrary, a cooperative agreement for which a certificate of public advantage has been issued is a lawful agreement. Notwithstanding title 47, chapter 25, or any other law to the contrary, if the parties to a cooperative agreement file an application for a certificate of public advantage governing the agreement with the department, the conduct of the parties in negotiating and entering into a cooperative agreement is lawful conduct. Nothing in this subsection (a) immunizes any person for conduct in negotiating and entering into a cooperative agreement for which an application for a certificate of public advantage is not filed.

If the department, or the other department or agency of state government to which the department has referred the application under § 33-2-704(d), determines that the likely benefits resulting from a cooperative agreement do not outweigh any disadvantages attributable to any potential reduction in competition resulting from the agreement, the agreement is invalid and has no further force or effect.

Any dispute among the parties to a cooperative agreement concerning its meaning or terms is governed by principles of contract law.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 6; T.C.A., § 33-2-906; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 349, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 349, § 10 provided that, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any increased costs resulting from that act in fiscal year 2001-2002 shall be paid from funds in the indigent defendants' counsel fund.

33-2-707. Application fees.

The department has the authority to establish reasonable application fees to cover the actual costs of administering this part by rules adopted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The department is authorized to adopt necessary rules to implement this part in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-2-907; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2003, ch. 149, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b) relating to the date by which the department must have applications available for use was deleted as obsolete by the Code Commission in 2015.

33-2-708. Center not authorized to act as insurer.

Unless otherwise permitted by law, nothing in this part shall be deemed to grant any community mental health center or group of community mental health centers pursuant to a cooperative agreement, the authority to operate as a health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, or insurer without obtaining an appropriate license from the department of commerce and insurance.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-2-908; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-709. Part not deemed to authorize referral to provider-owned facility in violation of law.

Nothing in this part shall be deemed to permit any referral to a provider-owned facility otherwise prohibited by state or federal law.

Acts 1998, ch. 1005, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-2-909; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.